Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.100

Payment of county's portion.

The county auditor of each county shall pay superior court judges in the same means and manner provided for all other elected officials.

[ 1997 c 204 s 1; 1939 c 189 s 1; 1893 c 30 s 1; 1890 p 329 s 2; RRS s 10967.]

NOTES:

Distribution of work of courts by chief justice—Unavailability of presiding judge in single judge court: RCW 2.56.040.